Hawaii statutes.
§181-7 Termination, revocation of permit;
release. (a) Any unexpired permit shall be effective only so long as the
operator possesses the legal right and power by legal estate owned to strip
mine from the land described in the permit. All authority of the board of land
and natural resources to enforce the requirements prescribed in section 181-6
shall terminate within ten years after the end of the permit year in which
strip mining was completed or abandoned upon the land unless before the end of
the period he has served upon the operator written directions to comply
therewith. The board shall release from the effect of this chapter, either by
reason of compliance or limitation of time, all or any part of the land
affected by this chapter by filing in the bureau of conveyances of the State,
or in the office of the assistant registrar of the land court, or both, as
appropriate, a written release in form prepared by the board.

(b) No permit shall be refused, modified,
suspended, canceled, or revoked by the board until after a hearing on written
charges has been had before the board after not less than ten days' written
notice, fixing date and place of the hearing, has been given to the operator.
[L 1957, c 161, §8; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp,
§98C-8; HRS §181-7; am L 1998, c 219, §4]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Cross References

Administrative hearings generally, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next